apertium-szl.szl.dix
<pardef n="BASE__mōj">
  <e>       <p><l>ōj</l>        <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōj</l>        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōj</l>        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oja</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oji</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojigo</l>     <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojigo</l>     <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojigo</l>     <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojij</l>      <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojigo</l>     <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojimu</l>     <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojimu</l>     <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojimu</l>     <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojij</l>      <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojimu</l>     <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojigo</l>     <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojigo</l>     <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōj</l>        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojã</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōj</l>        <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojōm</l>      <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojimi</l>     <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojimi</l>     <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojimi</l>     <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojimi</l>     <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojimi</l>     <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ojimi</l>     <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojij</l>      <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojim</l>      <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>ojich</l>     <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōj</l>        <r><s n="mp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōj</l>        <r><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ōj</l>        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oja</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oji</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>oje</l>       <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="m/ōj__det">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ōj<s n="det"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="BASE__mōj"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="m/ōj__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>ōj<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/></r></p><par n="BASE__mōj"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="jakkolwiek__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="BASE__wiela">
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ōma</l>       <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ōma</l>       <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="mp"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>u</l>         <r><s n="nm"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="dŏwnieć">         <i>dŏwnieć</i><par n="jakkolwiek__prn"/></e>
<e lm="jakosi">          <i>jakosi</i><par n="jakkolwiek__prn"/></e>
<e lm="kajś">            <i>kajś</i><par n="jakkolwiek__prn"/></e>
<e lm="kandyś">          <i>kandyś</i><par n="jakkolwiek__prn"/></e>
<e lm="kej ino">         <i>kej<b/>ino</i><par n="jakkolwiek__prn"/></e>
<e lm="kejś">            <i>kejś</i><par n="jakkolwiek__prn"/></e>
<e lm="mōj">             <i>m</i><par n="m/ōj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="skōndś">          <i>skōndś</i><par n="jakkolwiek__prn"/></e>
<e lm="swōj">            <i>sw</i><par n="m/ōj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="twōj">            <i>tw</i><par n="m/ōj__prn"/></e>
<e lm="mōj">             <i>m</i><par n="m/ōj__det"/></e>
<e lm="swōj">            <i>sw</i><par n="m/ōj__det"/></e>
<e lm="twōj">            <i>tw</i><par n="m/ōj__det"/></e>
<e lm="kejsik">          <i>kejsik</i><par n="jakkolwiek__prn"/></e>
<e lm="jakoś">           <i>jakoś</i><par n="jakkolwiek__prn"/></e>
